Hawaii statutes.
§249-15 Seizure and sale. [Section
effective January 1, 2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see
main volume.] The directors of finance, any person authoritatively acting
on behalf of the director of finance, or any member of a police force of the
several counties of the State may seize any bicycle or moped liable for the
payment of the required fees or which has no tag or decal affixed as required
by section 249-14 for bicycles, or license plate and tag or emblem affixed as
required by section 249‑14.1 for mopeds, and may hold the bicycle or
moped for a period of ten days, during which time it shall be subject to
redemption by its owner on payment of the fee due and a penalty of $25. All
bicycles and mopeds not so redeemed shall be sold by the county chief of police
or director of finance or their authorized representative, at public auction
after first giving five days public notice of the time and place of sale in the
county where the sale is to be held. Sale shall be made for the best price
obtainable, which amount shall be forthwith paid over to the director of
finance, accompanied by a statement containing a description of the bicycles or
mopeds, their serial number, makes, and any other marks of identification. The
director of finance, after deducting from the amount so received the amount of
the fee and penalty due and costs of giving public notice, shall pay any
surplus to the previous registered owners of the bicycles or mopeds. If at the
expiration of ninety days the previous registered owners remain unknown, the
surplus shall be paid into the treasury of the county, as a government
realization, and all claims to the sums shall be forever barred. [L 1905, c
101, pt of §1; am L 1923, c 120, pt of §1; RL 1925, pt of §1308; RL 1935, pt of
§2151; RL 1945, pt of §5702; RL 1955, §130-13; HRS §249-15; am L 1974, c 90,
§1; am L 1978, c 175, §4; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 264, §4; am L 1998, c 2,
§73; am L 2016, c 200, §4]

§249-15 Seizure and sale. The
directors of finance, any person authoritatively acting on behalf of the
director of finance, or any member of a police force of the several counties of
the State may seize any bicycle or moped liable for the payment of the required
fees or which has no tag or decal affixed as required by section 249-14, and
may hold the bicycle or moped for a period of ten days, during which time it
shall be subject to redemption by its owner on payment of the fee due and a
penalty of $1. All bicycles and mopeds not so redeemed shall be sold by the county
chief of police or director of finance or their authorized representative, at
public auction after first giving five days public notice of the time and place
of sale in the county where the sale is to be held. Sale shall be made for the
best price obtainable, which amount shall be forthwith paid over to the
director of finance, accompanied by a statement containing a description of the
bicycles or mopeds, their serial number, makes, and any other marks of
identification. The director of finance, after deducting from the amount so
received the amount of the fee and penalty due and costs of giving public
notice, shall pay any surplus to the previous registered owners of the bicycles
or mopeds. If at the expiration of ninety days the previous registered owners
remain unknown, the surplus shall be paid into the treasury of the county, as a
government realization, and all claims to the sums shall be forever barred. [L
1905, c 101, pt of §1; am L 1923, c 120, pt of §1; RL 1925, pt of §1308; RL
1935, pt of §2151; RL 1945, pt of §5702; RL 1955, §130-13; HRS §249-15; am L
1974, c 90, §1; am L 1978, c 175, §4; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 264, §4; am L
1998, c 2, §73]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next